Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202653-180.06
Documentary proof of age; separate book; record; contents.

(1) To establish proof of age for the purpose of purchasing or consuming alcoholic liquor, a person shall present or display only a valid driver's or operator's license, state identification card, military identification card, alien registration card, passport, or tribal enrollment card as defined in section 28-1202.03.

(2) Every holder of a retail license may maintain, in a separate book, a record of each person who has furnished documentary proof of age for the purpose of making any purchase of alcoholic liquor. The record shall show the name and address of the purchaser, the date of the purchase, and a description of the identification used and shall be signed by the purchaser.

Laws 1969, c. 437, § 1, p. 1467;

Laws 1991, LB 454, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 267, § 14;

Laws 2013, LB173, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB1288, § 3.